Hawaii statutes.
§334-82 Order to show cause; guardian ad
litem. Immediately upon receipt of a request, the court shall issue an
order to show cause directed to the administrator of the facility and
commanding the administrator to show cause at a date and time certain not later
than five days thereafter why the patient should not be discharged forthwith.
A copy of the request shall be attached to the order to show cause. The form
of the order to show cause shall be prescribed and supplied free of charge by
the court. The order to show cause shall issue without cost and may be served
as any other civil process or by any responsible person appointed by the court
for that purpose. At any stage of the proceedings, the court may appoint a
guardian ad litem for the patient. The guardian ad litem may be a member of
the bar of the court or any other responsible person. Service on the
administrator may be effected by leaving certified copies of the order to show
cause and request at the facility with any person exercising authority. [L
1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-82; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Service, see HRCP rule 4.

Guardian ad litem, see HRCP rule 17(c).

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next